California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
(d) Benefits specified by subdivision (a) based on service performed in the employ of a nonprofit organization, or of any entity as defined by Section 605, with respect to services specified by subdivision (b) or (c), are not payable to any individual with respect to any week that commences during an established and customary vacation period or holiday recess if the individual performs the services in the period immediately before the vacation period or holiday recess, and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform the services in the period immediately following the vacation period or holiday recess.

(e) With respect to any services specified by subdivision (b) or (c), compensation payable on the basis of services in that capacity may be denied as specified in subdivision (b), (c), or (d) to any individual who performed the services in an educational institution while in the employ of an educational service agency, and for this purpose the term “educational service agency” means a governmental agency or governmental entity that is established and operated exclusively for the purpose of providing the services to one or more educational institutions.

(f) Benefits specified by subdivision (a) based on service performed in the employ of a nonprofit organization, or of any entity as defined by Section 605, are not payable during the periods of time, and subject to the same conditions, contained in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), and (h), if the services are provided to, or on behalf of, an educational institution.

(g) For purposes of this section, “reasonable assurance” includes, but is not limited to, an offer of employment or assignment made by the educational institution, provided that the offer or assignment is not contingent on enrollment, funding, or program changes. An individual who has been notified that he or she will be replaced and does not have an offer of employment or assignment to perform services for an educational institution is not considered to have reasonable assurance.

(h) For purposes of this section, if the time for service performed during the period of and pursuant to any contract for any academic year or term by an individual for any employing unit as specified in subdivision (b) or (c) constitutes one-half or more of the time in total service performed for the employing unit by the individual during that same period for remuneration, all the services of the individual for the employing unit for that period shall be deemed subject to the benefit payment restriction provisions of this section.

(i) Any entity as defined by Section 605, with respect to any individual performing a service in any other capacity other than specified in subdivision (b) for an educational institution, shall provide a written statement indicating the following to the individual no later than 30 days before the end of the first of the academic years or terms:

(1) Whether or not there is a reasonable assurance of reemployment.

(2) Whether or not it is stated that the individual has no reasonable assurance of reemployment, that the individual should file a claim for benefits at the close of the academic year or term.

(3) If it is stated that the individual has reasonable assurance of reemployment, the written statement shall also inform the employee that he or she may file a claim for benefits and that the determination for eligibility for benefits is made by the Employment Development Department and not by the employer.

(4) If it is stated that the individual has reasonable assurance of reemployment, that the individual shall be entitled to a retroactive payment of benefits if the individual is not offered an opportunity to perform the services for the educational institution for the second of the academic years or terms, if the individual is otherwise eligible and he or she filed a claim for each week benefits are claimed, and if a claim for retroactive benefits is made no later than 30 days following the commencement of the second academic year or term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 255, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Applicable from December 21, 2000, pursuant to Sec. 17 of Ch. 255.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.4.

Unemployment compensation benefits, extended duration benefits, and federal-state extended benefits shall not be payable to any individual on the basis of any services, substantially all of which consist of participating in sports or athletic events or training or preparing to so participate, for any week which commences during the period between two successive sport seasons, or similar periods, if such individual performed such services in the first of such seasons, or similar periods, and there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services in the later of such seasons, or similar periods.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 1253, if an individual is, in all other respects, eligible for benefits under this part, and such individual becomes unable to work due to a physical or mental illness or injury for one or more days during such week, he shall be paid unemployment compensation benefits at the rate of one-seventh the weekly benefit amount payable for that week for each day which he is available for work and able to work. The amount of benefits payable, if not a multiple of one dollar ($1), shall be computed to the next higher multiple of one dollar ($1). The individual shall not be entitled to unemployment compensation benefits for any day during such week which he is unable to work due to such physical or mental illness or injury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1185.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.6.

For purposes of subdivision (c) of Section 1253, an unemployed individual who is in all respects otherwise eligible for unemployment compensation benefits, shall not be deemed to be not able to, or unavailable for, work for any week in which such person is not able to, or available for, work solely because such person is serving on a grand or petit jury, or is responding to a subpoena.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 473.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.7.

For the purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 1253, an individual shall not be disqualified for any week solely because of either of the following:

(a) The individual is before any court of the United States or any state pursuant to a lawfully issued summons to appear for jury duty.

(b) The individual is hospitalized for treatment of an emergency or life-threatening condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 716, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.8.

An unemployed individual shall not be disqualified for eligibility for unemployment compensation benefits solely on the basis that he or she is only available for part-time work. If an individual restricts his or her availability to part-time work, he or she may be considered to be able to work and available for work pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1253 if it is determined that all of following conditions exist:

(a) The claim is based on the part-time employment.

(b) The claimant is actively seeking and is willing to accept work under essentially the same conditions as existed while the wage credits were accrued.

(c) The claimant imposes no other restrictions and is in a labor market in which a reasonable demand exists for the part-time services he or she offers.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 409, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.9.

An unemployed individual may not be disqualified for unemployment compensation benefits solely on the basis that he or she is a student. An unemployed individual may be considered to be able and available for work pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1253, if the school attendance does not eliminate a substantial portion of the individual’s full-time labor market availability. If an unemployed individual restricts his or her availability to part-time work due to school attendance, he or she may be considered to be able to work and available for work if he or she meets the criteria set forth in Section 1253.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1022, Sec. 10.   Effective September 28, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.92.

(a) An unemployed individual who meets all of the requirements under this division, including Section 1253.9, and certifies for continued unemployment compensation benefits shall not be scheduled for a determination of eligibility for a week in which the individual commenced or is participating in a training or education program and has notified the department of the training or education program.

(b) If the department determines that the commencement of, or the ongoing participation in, a training or education program conflicts with the eligibility requirements for unemployment compensation under this division, the department may schedule and conduct a determination of eligibility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 520.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1254.

No week shall be counted as a week of unemployment under subdivision (d) of Section 1253:

(a) Unless it occurs within the benefit year which includes the week with respect to which he claims payment of unemployment compensation benefits, but this requirement shall not interrupt the payment of such benefits for consecutive weeks of unemployment. The week immediately preceding a benefit year, if part of one uninterrupted period of unemployment which continues into that benefit year shall be deemed, for the purposes of this section only, to be within such benefit year as well as within the preceding benefit year.

(b) If unemployment compensation benefits have been paid with respect to that week.

(c) Unless the individual was eligible for unemployment compensation benefits with respect thereto in all respects, except for the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 1253 and Section 1281.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1255.

An individual is not eligible for unemployment compensation benefits on account of unemployment for any week or part of any week with respect to which he has received or is seeking unemployment benefits under an unemployment compensation law of any other state or of the United States. If the appropriate agency of the other state or of the United States finally determines that he is not entitled to unemployment compensation benefits, this section shall not apply.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1255.3.

(a) Except as provided by subdivisions (c) and (d), the amount of unemployment compensation benefits, extended duration benefits, and federal-state extended benefits payable to an individual for any week which begins after March 31, 1980, and which begins in a period with respect to which that individual is receiving a governmental or other pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity, or any other similar periodic payment which is based on the previous work of the individual shall be reduced, but not below zero, by an amount equal to the amount of the pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity, or other payment, which is reasonably attributable to that week.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall be operative only during such time as Section 3304 of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act requires that state unemployment insurance laws contain those provisions as a condition of certification of state unemployment insurance laws by the Secretary of Labor.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall apply to any pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity, or other similar periodic payment only if both of the following are met: 

(1) The pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity, or similar payment is under a plan maintained (or contributed to) by a base period or chargeable employer.

(2) In the case of such a payment not made under the federal Social Security Act or the federal Railroad Retirement Act of 1974 (or the corresponding provisions of prior law), services performed for the employer by the individual after the beginning of the base period (or remuneration for such services) affect eligibility for, or increase the amount of, such pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity, or similar periodic payment.

(d) (1) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to any pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity or other similar periodic payment if the individual has made any contribution to the pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity, or other similar periodic payment.

(2) The amendments made to this subdivision during the 1986 portion of the 1985–86 Regular Session shall apply to new claims filed with an effective date beginning on or after January 1, 1987.

(e) The amendments made to subdivision (c) of this section during the 1985 portion of the 1985–86 Regular Session shall apply retroactively to all unemployment compensation benefits, extended duration benefits, and federal-state extended benefits, payable to an individual for any week which begins after November 1, 1980.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 956, Sec. 1.   Effective September 22, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

1255.5.

(a) An individual is not eligible for unemployment compensation benefits or extended duration benefits for the same day or days of unemployment for which he is allowed by the Workmen’s Compensation Appeals Board, or for which he receives, benefits in the form of cash payments for temporary total disability indemnity, under a workmen’s compensation law, or employer’s liability law of this state, or of any other state, or of the federal government, except that if such cash payments are less than the amount he would otherwise receive as unemployment compensation benefits or extended duration benefits under this division, he shall be entitled to receive for such day or days, if otherwise eligible, unemployment compensation benefits or extended duration benefits reduced by the amount of such cash payments.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, an individual who is ineligible to receive unemployment compensation benefits or extended duration benefits under subdivision (a) of this section for one or more days of a week of unemployment and who is eligible to receive unemployment compensation benefits or extended duration benefits for the other days of that week is, with respect to that week, entitled to an amount of unemployment compensation benefits or extended duration benefits computed by reducing his weekly benefit amount by the amount of temporary total disability indemnity received for that week.

(c) The amount determined under subdivision (a) or (b), if not a multiple of one dollar ($1), shall be computed to the next higher multiple of one dollar ($1).

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1721.)
-------------------------------------------

1255.7.

(a) The Department of Child Support Services shall notify the director whether an individual filing a claim for unemployment compensation after October 1, 1982, owes support obligations as defined under subdivision (h), and notify the department of any changes in the status of these individuals to ensure that the department has a current record.

(b) The department shall maintain and keep current a record of individuals who owe support obligations and who may have claims for unemployment compensation benefits.

(c) The department shall deduct and withhold support obligations as defined under subdivision (h) from any unemployment compensation payable to an individual who owes these obligations.

(d) Any amount deducted and withheld under subdivision (c) shall be paid by the department to the appropriate county or to the Department of Child Support Services as the assigned payee, as stipulated by mutual agreement, in the interagency agreement between the department and the Department of Child Support Services.

(e) Any amount deducted and withheld under subdivision (c) shall for all purposes be treated as if it were paid to the individual as unemployment compensation and paid by the individual to the Department of Child Support Services.

(f) For purposes of subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, “unemployment compensation” means any compensation payable under this division, except Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601), but including amounts payable by the department pursuant to an agreement under any federal unemployment compensation law.

(g) This section applies only if appropriate arrangements have been made for reimbursement by the Department of Child Support Services for the administrative costs incurred by the Employment Development Department.

(h) For purposes of this section, “support obligations” means the child and related spousal support obligations which are being enforced pursuant to a plan described in Section 454 of the Social Security Act and as that section may hereafter be amended. However, to the extent “related spousal support obligations” may not be collected from unemployment compensation under federal law, those obligations shall not be included in the definition of support obligations under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 116.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1256.

An individual is disqualified for unemployment compensation benefits if the director finds that he or she left his or her most recent work voluntarily without good cause or that he or she has been discharged for misconduct connected with his or her most recent work.

An individual is presumed to have been discharged for reasons other than misconduct in connection with his or her work and not to have voluntarily left his or her work without good cause unless his or her employer has given written notice to the contrary to the department as provided in Section 1327, setting forth facts sufficient to overcome the presumption. The presumption provided by this section is rebuttable.

An individual whose employment is terminated under the compulsory retirement provisions of a collective bargaining agreement to which the employer is a party,
 shall not be deemed to have left his or her work without good cause.

An individual may be deemed to have left his or her most recent work with good cause if he or she leaves employment to accompany his or her spouse or domestic partner to a place or to join him or her at a place from which it is impractical to commute to the employment. For purposes of this section “spouse” includes a person to whom marriage is imminent, and “domestic partner” includes a person to whom a domestic partnership, as described in Section 297 of the Family Code, is imminent.

An individual may be deemed to have left his or her most recent work with good cause if he or she leaves employment to protect his or her
 family, or himself or herself, from domestic violence abuse.

An individual shall be deemed to have left his or her most recent work with good cause if he or she elects to be laid off in place of an employee with less seniority pursuant to a provision in a collective bargaining agreement that provides that an employee with more seniority may elect to be laid off in place of an employee with less seniority when the employer has decided to lay off employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 678, Sec. 3.5.   (AB 2364)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1256.1.

(a) If the employment of an individual is terminated due to his absence from work for a period in excess of 24 hours because of his incarceration and he is convicted of the offense for which he was incarcerated or of any lesser included offense, he shall be deemed to have left his work voluntarily without good cause for the purposes of Section 1256. A plea or verdict of guilty, or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere, is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section irrespective of whether an order granting probation or other order is made suspending the imposition of the sentence or whether sentence is imposed but execution thereof is suspended.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, any determination made prior to a conviction or other final disposition of the criminal complaint or accusation by the court as to whether an individual who is terminated due to his absence from work because of incarceration voluntarily leaves without good cause may, if no appeal has been taken from the determination, for good cause be reconsidered by the department during the benefit year or extended duration period to which the determination relates. Notice of any reconsidered determination shall be given to the claimant and any employer or employing unit which received notice under Section 1328 or 1331, and the claimant or employer may appeal therefrom in the manner prescribed in Section 1328.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 833.)
-------------------------------------------

1256.2.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), an individual who terminates his or her employment shall not be deemed to have left his or her most recent work without good cause if his or her employer deprived the individual of equal employment opportunities on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to the following:

(1) A deprivation of equal employment opportunities that is based upon a bona fide occupational qualification or applicable security regulations established by the United States or this state, specifically, as provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(2) An individual who fails to make reasonable efforts to provide the employer with an opportunity to remove any unintentional deprivation of the individual’s equal employment opportunities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 788, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1256.3.

For the purposes of Sections 1256, 1256.1, 1256.2, 1256.4, and 1256.5, “most recent work” is that work in which a claimant last performed compensated services:

(a) Prior to and nearest the date of filing a valid new, reopened, or additional claim for unemployment compensation benefits, a valid primary, reopened, or additional claim for extended duration benefits, or a valid application, or reopened or additional claim for federal-state extended benefits.

(b) During the calendar week for which a continued claim is filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 152, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1256.4.

(a) An individual is disqualified for unemployment compensation benefits if either of the following occur:

(1) The director finds that he or she was discharged from his or her most recent work for chronic absenteeism due to intoxication or reporting to work while intoxicated or using intoxicants on the job, or gross neglect of duty while intoxicated, when any of these incidents is caused by an irresistible compulsion to use or consume intoxicants, including alcoholic beverages.

(2) He or she otherwise left his or her most recent employment for reasons caused by an irresistible compulsion to use or consume intoxicants, including alcoholic beverages.

(b) An individual disqualified under this section, under a determination transmitted to him or her by the department, is ineligible to receive unemployment compensation benefits under this part for the week in which the separation occurs, and continuing until he or she has performed service in bona fide employment for which remuneration is received equal to or in excess of five times his or her weekly benefit amount, or until a physician or authorized treatment program administrator certifies that the individual has entered into and is continuing in, or has completed, a treatment program for his or her condition and is able to return to employment.

(c) The department shall advise each individual disqualified under this section of the benefits available under Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601), and, if assistance in locating an appropriate treatment program is requested, refer the individual to the appropriate county drug or alcohol program administrator.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1256.5 by Stats. 2005, Ch. 152, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1256.5.

(a) An individual shall be deemed to have left his or her most recent work with good cause if the director finds that he or she leaves employment because of sexual harassment if the individual has taken reasonable steps to preserve the working relationship. No steps shall be required if the director finds it would have been futile. For purposes of this subdivision, unwelcome sexual advances, requests for sexual favors, and other verbal, visual, or physical conduct of a sexual nature constitutes sexual harassment when any of the following occur:

(1) Submission to the conduct is made either explicitly or implicitly a term or condition of an individual’s employment.

(2) Submission to or rejection of the conduct by an individual is used as the basis for employment decisions affecting the individual.

(3) The conduct has the purpose or effect of unreasonably interfering with an individual’s work performance or creating an intimidating, hostile, or offensive working environment.

(b) Findings of fact and law by the director shall not collaterally estop adjudication of the issue of sexual harassment in another forum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 644.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1257.

An individual is also disqualified for unemployment compensation benefits if:

(a) He or she willfully, for the purpose of obtaining unemployment compensation benefits, either made a false statement or representation, including, but not limited to, using a false name, false social security number, or other false identification, with actual knowledge of the falsity thereof, or withheld a material fact in order to obtain any unemployment compensation benefits under this division.

(b) He or she, without good cause, refused to accept suitable employment when offered to him or her, or failed to apply for suitable employment when notified by a public employment office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 397, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1258.

“Suitable employment” means work in the individual’s usual occupation or for which he is reasonably fitted, regardless of whether or not it is subject to this division.

In determining whether the work is work for which the individual is reasonably fitted, the director shall consider the degree of risk involved to the individual’s health, safety, and morals, his physical fitness and prior training, his experience and prior earnings, his length of unemployment and prospects for securing local work in his customary occupation, and the distance of the available work from his residence, and such other factors as would influence a reasonably prudent person in the individual’s circumstances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 715.)
-------------------------------------------

1258.5.

“Suitable employment” does not include employment with an employer who does not:

(a) Possess an appropriate state license to engage in his business, trade, or profession; or

(b) Withhold or hold in trust the employee contributions required by Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of this division for unemployment compensation disability benefits and does not transmit all such employee contributions to the department for the Disability Fund as required by Section 986; or

(c) Carry either workers’ compensation insurance or possess a certificate of self-insurance as required by Division 4 (commencing with Section 3201) of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

1259.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this division, no work or employment shall be deemed suitable and benefits shall not be denied to any otherwise eligible and qualified individual for refusing new work under any of the following conditions:

(a) If the position offered is vacant due directly to a strike, lockout, or other labor dispute.

(b) If the wages, hours, or other conditions of the work offered are substantially less favorable to the individual than those prevailing for similar work in the locality.

(c) If, as a condition of being employed, the individual would be required to join a company union or to resign from or refrain from joining any bona fide labor organization.

(d) If the offer of employment is from an employer who does not possess an appropriate state license to engage in his business, trade, or profession if required by state law.

(e) If the offer of employment is from an employer who does not carry either workmen’s compensation insurance or possess a certificate of self-insurance as required by Division 4 (commencing with Section 3201) of the Labor Code.

(f) If the offer of employment is from an employer who does not withhold or hold in trust the employee contributions required by Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of this division for unemployment compensation disability benefits and does not transmit all such employee contributions to the department for the Disability Fund as required by Section 986.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

1260.

(a) An individual disqualified under Section 1256, under a determination transmitted to the individual by the department, is ineligible to receive unemployment compensation benefits for the week in which the act that causes the disqualification occurs and continuing until they have, subsequent to the act that causes disqualification and their registration for work, performed service in bona fide employment for which remuneration is received equal to or in excess of five times their weekly benefit amount.

(b) An individual disqualified under subdivision (b) of Section 1257, under a determination transmitted to the individual by the department, is ineligible to receive unemployment compensation benefits for not less than 2 and no more than 10 consecutive weeks
 beginning with:

(1) The week in which the cause of the disqualification occurs, if the individual registers for work in that week.

(2) The week subsequent to the occurrence of the cause of the individual’s disqualification in which they first register for work, if they do not register for work in the week in which the cause of their disqualification occurs.

(c) An individual disqualified under subdivision (a) of Section 1257, under a determination transmitted to the individual by the department, and who was not paid any benefit amount as a result of their false statement or representation, is ineligible to receive unemployment compensation benefits for two weeks commencing with the week in which the determination is served upon them, or any subsequent week, for which they are first otherwise in all respects eligible for unemployment compensation benefits and for not more than 13 subsequent weeks for which they are otherwise in all respects eligible for unemployment compensation benefits. No disqualification under this subdivision shall be applied to any week if all or any portion of the week is beyond the three-year period next succeeding the date of the service of the determination. This subdivision shall not apply to an individual convicted under Section 2101.

(d) An individual disqualified under subdivision (a) of Section 1257, under a determination transmitted to the individual by the department, and who was paid any benefit amount as a result of their false statement or representation, is ineligible to receive unemployment compensation benefits for five weeks commencing with the week in which the determination is served upon them, or any subsequent week, for which they are first otherwise in all respects eligible for unemployment compensation benefits and for not more than 10 subsequent weeks for which they are otherwise in all respects eligible for unemployment compensation benefits. No disqualification under this subdivision shall be applied to any week if all or any portion of the week is beyond the three-year period next succeeding the date of the service of the determination. This subdivision shall not apply to an individual convicted under Section 2101.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) or (d), an individual who is subject to a disqualification that is imposed under subdivision (b) of Section 1257 may, if they are otherwise in all respects eligible for unemployment compensation benefits, concurrently serve a disqualification imposed under subdivision (a) of Section 1257.

(f) Prior to disqualifying an individual pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1257 and subjecting that individual to the period of ineligibility described in subdivision (c) or (d), the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide notice to the individual of the proposed determination. This notice may be
 combined with other notices from the department, which may include, but are not limited to, notifications of potential overpayments and of eligibility interviews.

(A) The notice shall state the eligibility provision related to the false statement or misrepresentation on which the department is determining whether to disqualify the individual pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1257.

(B) The notice shall state the individual’s right to respond to the notice pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) Provide the individual with a period of not less than 10 days, or 3 days for individuals who opt into electronic communications, to respond by telephone or in writing to the proposed determination of ineligibility pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1257 by explaining any alleged false or withheld facts, statements, or
 representations.

(3) After an individual has responded to the allegations or after 10 or 3 days, as applicable, if the individual fails to respond, the department may issue a final notice of determination to an individual. That notice shall contain all of the following:

(A) The number of weeks for which the individual is ineligible for benefits pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d).

(B) The eligibility provision related to the false statement or misrepresentation that serves as the basis for the department’s disqualification of the individual pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1257.

(C) The individual’s right to appeal the determination as described in paragraph (4).

(4) The individual
 may appeal the determination to an administrative law judge within 30 days from service of the notice of determination. The 30-day period may be extended by the administrative law judge for good cause, including, but not be limited to, mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect. The director shall be an interested party to any appeal.

(5) The department shall implement this subdivision upon completing any necessary technical changes to fulfill the requirements of this subdivision or by September 1, 2022, whichever is earlier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 22.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1260.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, benefits shall not be denied to any individual by reason of cancellation of wage credits or total reduction of his benefit rights for any cause other than discharge for misconduct connected with his work, fraud in connection with a claim for benefits, or receipt of disqualifying income. This section shall not be construed to authorize cancellation of wage credits or total reduction of benefit rights for any cause whatsoever, nor shall it limit or affect any other section that provides for cancellation of wage credits or total reduction of benefit rights for any cause permitted under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 833.)
-------------------------------------------

1261.

When successive disqualifications under Section 1257 occur, the director may extend the period of ineligibility provided for in Section 1260 for an additional period not to exceed eight additional weeks. With regard to successive disqualifications pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1257, the department is required to have complied with subdivision (f) of Section 1260 for each successive disqualification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 516, Sec. 2.   (AB 397)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1262.

An individual is not eligible for unemployment compensation benefits, and these benefits shall not be payable to him or her, if the individual left his or her work because of a trade dispute. The individual shall remain ineligible for the period during which he or she continues out of work by reason of the fact that the trade dispute is still in active progress in the establishment in which he or she was employed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 645.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1262.5.

Whenever the department learns that a trade dispute is in progress, the department shall promptly conduct an investigation and make investigation findings as to the nature, location, labor organizations and employers involved, and other relevant facts concerning the trade dispute as it deems necessary. The department shall provide its findings to its field offices in locations affected by the trade dispute, and shall, upon request, make its findings available to any employer, employers’ association or labor organization involved in the trade dispute. The department’s investigation findings shall be based upon the information then available to it and shall not be a determination as to the eligibility of any claimant for benefits under Section 1262.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1100.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.

(a) Any individual convicted under Section 2101 by any court of competent jurisdiction of willfully making a false statement or knowingly failing to disclose a material fact to obtain or increase any benefit or payment under this division shall forfeit any rights to benefits for the week in which the criminal complaint was filed and for the 51 consecutive calendar weeks which immediately follow that week, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the individual to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty or dismissing the criminal complaint, but a forfeiture of benefits under this subdivision shall extend no later than the effective date of any order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code, and, if the period of forfeiture has not previously expired, the forfeiture of benefits under this subdivision shall terminate as of the effective date of any such order. 
